District of Columbia statutes.
7-2050

Pending actions and proceedings; existing orders.

(a)

No judicial or administrative proceeding commenced by or against any child development facility, or officer or employee of a child development facility in his or her official capacity, shall abate by reason of the taking effect of this subchapter; but the action or proceeding shall be continued with substitution as to parties and officers or agencies as are appropriate.

(b)

All decisions issued pursuant to the Child Development Facilities Regulation shall continue in effect until modified, rescinded, or superseded by rules or regulation issued pursuant to this subchapter.

History

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 21, 46 DCR 274

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3640.

Temporary Addition of Section

See notes to § 7-2031.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.
For temporary (90 day) criminal background check provisions, see §§ 201 to 214 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-310, March 26, 2002, 49 DCR 3420).